Idaho, session 2026, S1429.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT & PREVENTION:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $533,900 $116,100 $650,000
II. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES:
A. CHILDREN'S MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $840,900 $2,505,200 $3,346,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,055,100 $266,500 1,780,700 3,102,300
TOTAL $1,896,000 $266,500 $4,285,900 $6,448,400
B. ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $134,000 $100,000 $351,800 $585,800
State-Directed Opioid Settlement
Fund 0 0 992,600 992,600
TOTAL $134,000 $100,000 $1,344,400 $1,578,400
DIVISIONTOTAL $2,030,000 $366,500 $5,630,300 $8,026,800
III. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. STATE HOSPITAL NORTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $1,136,600 $441,400 $95,000 $126,300 $1,799,300
State Hospital North Endowment Income
Fund 0 212,900 0 0 212,900
TOTAL $1,136,600 $654,300 $95,000 $126,300 $2,012,200
B. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $5,540,500 $5,540,500
Mental Hospital Endowment Income
Fund 0 $216,100 216,100
TOTAL $5,540,500 $216,100 $5,756,600
DIVISIONTOTAL $6,677,100 $654,300 $311,100 $126,300 $7,768,800
GRANDTOTAL $9,241,000 $1,020,800 $311,100 $5,872,700 $16,445,600
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare is hereby
reduced by the following amounts from the designated programs and expense


classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT & PREVENTION:
FROM:
Liquor Control
Fund $533,900 $116,100 $650,000
II. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES:
A. CHILDREN'S MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $288,400 $288,400
B. ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $496,300 $496,300
DIVISION TOTAL $288,400 $496,300 $784,700
III. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. STATE HOSPITAL NORTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $212,900 $212,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $1,699,300 0 1,699,300
TOTAL $1,699,300 $212,900 $1,912,200
B. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Mental Hospital Endowment Income
Fund $43,900 $43,900


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 5,496,600 5,496,600
TOTAL $5,540,500 $5,540,500
DIVISION TOTAL $7,239,800 $212,900 $7,452,700
GRAND TOTAL $7,773,700 $501,300 $612,400 $8,887,400
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Mental Health Services Di-
vision is hereby increased by fifteen (15.00) for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare Divi-
sion of Mental Health Services and Division of Psychiatric Hospitalization
may transfer moneys appropriated for personnel costs and trustee and bene-
fit payments pursuant to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. REQUIRING A REPORT ON THE IDAHO BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PLAN. The
Department of Health and Welfare Division of Mental Health Services shall
provide a report on fiscal year 2025 and fiscal year 2026 expenditures for
the Idaho Behavioral Health Plan. The report shall include actual expendi-
tures for services provided to the adults' population and services provided
to the children's population under the Idaho Behavioral Health Plan. The
format of the report and the type of information included therein shall be
determined by the Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Di-
vision. The report shall be submitted to the Joint Finance-Appropriations
Committee and the Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Di-
vision no later than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 209, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Division
of Psychiatric Hospitalization the following amounts to be expended accord-
ing to the designated programs and expense classes from the Cooperative Wel-
fare (Dedicated) Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
StateHospitalNorth $700,000 $436,400 $46,000 $1,182,400
StateHospitalSouth 4,871,600 0 0 4,871,600
TOTAL $5,571,600 $436,400 $46,000 $6,054,000
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare in Section 1,
Chapter 209, Laws of 2025, is hereby reduced by the following amounts for the
Division of Psychiatric Hospitalization from the designated programs from
personnel costs from the Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
State Hospital North $1,182,400
State Hospital South 4,871,600
TOTAL $6,054,000
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 7 and 8 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 6 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.